Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-295
Statutes of limitations; not extended; applicability of sections.

Nothing contained in sections 25-207, 25-213, 40-104, and 76-288 to 76-298 shall be construed to extend the period for bringing an action or doing any act required under any existing statute of limitations, nor to affect the operation of any existing acts governing the effect of the recording or the failure to record any instrument affecting lands.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 8, p. 765.